Mississippi, session 2026, HB143.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 41-77-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 41-77-7.  * * *No license shall be issued to a "birthing center" until such "birthing center" shall have obtained a written agreement with a hospital which has an organized obstetrical service and provides such service on a continuing basis, stating that said hospital agrees to accept from the " birthing center" such cases as may need to be referred for whatever reason from the " birthing center."" (1)  A licensed birthing center shall establish a written transfer plan that involves appropriate levels of care when client conditions require it, and must periodically provide a local hospital with written notice of its operations and patient population served. (2)  (a)  In order to be licensed by the licensing agency, a birthing center must be in compliance with the American Association of Birth Centers's (AABC) Standards for Birth Centers, including establishing a written transfer plan. (b)  Birth center management is required to complete AABC's training, "Birth Center Transfer and Transport - Optimal Practice for Safe and Satisfying Transitions of Care," and take the following steps to develop a timely transfer plan: (i) Coordination and collaboration with emergency medical services (EMS); (ii)  Birth center and EMS planning meeting; and (iii)  EMS drill planning and debriefing. The nurse midwife must accompany the patient during the EMS transfer and provide critical oral and written information to the hospital ER team. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.